Vermont statutes. TITLE 16A Education Charters and Agreements
Subchapter 1. Purpose, Definitions, Legal Matters, and Miscellaneous Comprehensive Revision 1983

§ 11-1.1.
Consolidation.

No. 113 of the Acts of 1872, entitled “An act to establish the Essex Junction Graded School District” (which shall hereafter be called the Essex Junction school district) and all amendments and additions thereto, is hereby amended and consolidated so
as to read as follows.

§ 11-1.2.
Incorporation of district.

All that portion of the Town of Essex now embraced within the limits of the Essex Junction School District as incorporated by No. 113 of the Acts of 1872, and as has been amended and added thereto and which is also embraced within the limits of the incorporated
Village of Essex Junction together with the inhabitants therein is hereby incorporated and made a body politic and corporate and shall hereafter be known by the name of the Essex Junction School District and by that name may use and
be used, prosecute and defend in any court, may have a corporate seal and alter it at pleasure, may take, hold, and convey real and personal property and estate, may levy and collect taxes, and generally shall have the rights and liabilities
incident to municipal corporations.

§ 11-1.3.
Disposition of property.

All property, assets, and liabilities now belonging to the Essex Junction Graded School District shall at the time of the taking effect of this chapter vest in and become property, asset, liability or both, of the Essex Junction School District as incorporated
by this chapter.

§ 11-1.4.
Definition of district.

Wherever the “District” hereafter appears in this chapter, it shall mean the Essex Junction School District.

§ 11-1.5.
Exemption from taxation.

The District shall be exempt from all local taxation in the Town of Essex.

§ 11-1.6.
District voter.

A citizen of voting age, as defined by State and federal law, whose name is on the voting list taken in the Village of Essex Junction at the annual assessment next preceding a District meeting or who has attained voting age subsequent to such assessment,
shall while residing in the District be a voter in such District.

§ 11-1.7.
Inconsistency with general law.

This chapter shall control whenever any general act or law is inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

§ 11-1.8.
Effect of prior law.

All acts, parts of acts, and bylaws, inconsistent with this chapter, except as herein otherwise provided, are hereby repealed. By the provisions of this chapter, so far as they are the same as those acts hereby amended, shall be construed as a continuation
and consolidation of such acts, and not as new enactments.

§ 11-1.9.
Implementation of charter.

This chapter shall not become operative or effective until approved, ratified, and adopted by a majority of the legal voters of the Essex Junction School District voting at a duly warned meeting. If this chapter is voted favorably by a majority of the
District, that vote shall be certified to the Secretary of State pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 702
and shall become effective pursuant to the provisions thereof.